trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="the__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/otter__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>otter</l>     <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ottern</l>    <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öttrar</l>    <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öttrarna</l>  <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="deputerad__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="orak/el__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ans__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ringfing/er__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vin__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="penis__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sitkom__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mar</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>marna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="as__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rododendr/on__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>onen</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gudm/oder__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odern</l>     <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ödrar</l>     <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ödrarna</l>   <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aktiv/um__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="strat/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="rhododendron">    <i>rhododendr</i><par n="rododendr/on__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="orakel">          <i>orak</i><par n="orak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kuriosum">        <i>kurios</i><par n="strat/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ringfinger">      <i>ringfing</i><par n="ringfing/er__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="sitkom">          <i>sitkom</i><par n="sitkom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="romkom">          <i>romkom</i><par n="sitkom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stadsfullmäktig"> <i>stadsfullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="the">             <i>the</i><par n="the__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mirakel">         <i>mirak</i><par n="orak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kvartssekel">     <i>kvartssek</i><par n="orak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kommunfullmäktig"><i>kommunfullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stratum">         <i>strat</i><par n="strat/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="rododendron">     <i>rododendr</i><par n="rododendr/on__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="narkotikum">      <i>narkotik</i><par n="strat/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="depositum">       <i>deposit</i><par n="strat/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tabernakel">      <i>tabernak</i><par n="orak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="halvsekel">       <i>halvsek</i><par n="orak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sitcom">          <i>sitcom</i><par n="sitkom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kyrkofullmäktig"> <i>kyrkofullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="deputerad">       <i>deputerad</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bankofullmäktig"> <i>bankofullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="romcom">          <i>romcom</i><par n="sitkom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="granulum">        <i>granul</i><par n="strat/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cenakel">         <i>cenak</i><par n="orak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kommunalfullmäktig"><i>kommunalfullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="perfektum">       <i>perfekt</i><par n="aktiv/um__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="passivum">        <i>passiv</i><par n="aktiv/um__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="pluskvamperfektum"><i>pluskvamperfekt</i><par n="aktiv/um__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="imperfektum">     <i>imperfekt</i><par n="aktiv/um__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="aktivum">         <i>aktiv</i><par n="aktiv/um__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="femininum">       <i>feminin</i><par n="aktiv/um__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="lättmargarin">    <i>lättmargarin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="endorfin">        <i>endorfin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="silversalt">      <i>silversalt</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="benporslin">      <i>benporslin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="transfett">       <i>transfett</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dioxin">          <i>dioxin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="omnibus">         <i>omnibus</i><par n="as__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sondotter">       <i>sond</i><par n="d/otter__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="svärdotter">      <i>svärd</i><par n="d/otter__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="systerdotter">    <i>systerd</i><par n="d/otter__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bag-in-box">      <i>bag-in-box</i><par n="as__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="radondotter">     <i>radond</i><par n="d/otter__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gudmoder">        <i>gudm</i><par n="gudm/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="adonis">          <i>adonis</i><par n="as__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fokus">           <i>fokus</i><par n="penis__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klots">           <i>klots</i><par n="as__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="biceps">          <i>biceps</i><par n="penis__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="brysselspets">    <i>brysselspets</i><par n="as__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dotterdotter">    <i>dotterd</i><par n="d/otter__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="focus">           <i>focus</i><par n="penis__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="turs">            <i>turs</i><par n="as__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="penis">           <i>penis</i><par n="penis__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tsardotter">      <i>tsard</i><par n="d/otter__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rhythm-and-blues"><i>rhythm-and-blues</i><par n="ans__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="antimonglans">    <i>antimonglans</i><par n="ans__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trandans">        <i>trandans</i><par n="ans__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="triss">           <i>triss</i><par n="ans__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="abstinens">       <i>abstinens</i><par n="ans__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="raps">            <i>raps</i><par n="ans__n_ut"/></e>
